Virginia statutes. Title 22.1. Education.
Article 2. Special Taxes; Uniform Levies.

§ 22.1-102.
Special tax for capital expenditures or payment of indebtedness or rent.

For capital expenditures and for the payment of indebtedness or rent, a governing body may, in addition to the levy and appropriation required under the provisions of §§ 22.1-94 and 22.1-95, levy a special county tax, a special district tax, a special city tax or a special town tax, as the case may be, on all property subject to local taxation. Such levy or levies shall be at such rate or rates as the governing body levying the tax may deem necessary for the purpose or purposes for which levied, except that where the tax is for raising funds for capital expenditures the rate shall not be more than $2.50 on each $100 of the assessed value of such property in any one year.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-128; 1959, Ex. Sess., c. 79, § 1; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 162; 1980, c. 559.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Special school tax. —

County Board of Supervisors may levy special school tax as a special county tax to fund capital expenditures or payment of indebtedness or rent. See opinion of Attorney General to Michelle R. Robl, County Attorney, Prince William County, 20-029, 2021 Va. AG LEXIS 19 (5/14/21).

§ 22.1-103.
Uniform county levy in lieu of district levies; request by school board; petition for referendum.

In any county in which the governing body imposes district levies for school purposes, the school board may, by resolution, request the governing body to impose a uniform county levy for school purposes with the proceeds to be expended as provided by law and such expenditures shall include the repayment of district school obligations. Upon the receipt of any such resolution the governing body shall petition the circuit court of the county to fix a date for a referendum to obtain the sense of the qualified voters upon such change.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-130.1; 1958, c. 45; 1980, c. 559.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

16 M.J. Schools, § 25.

§ 22.1-104.
Same; order for referendum; notice.

Upon receiving such petition, the court shall enter an order setting a date for the referendum in accordance with §§

24.2-682

and

24.2-684

. A certified copy of the order shall be served upon the election officials of the county. Notice of the date of the referendum and the purpose thereof shall be posted on the front door of the courthouse.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-130.2; 1958, c. 45; 1975, c. 517; 1980, c. 559.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

16 M.J. Schools, § 25.

§ 22.1-105.
Same; conduct of referendum; certification of results.

On the day named in the order the election officials of the county shall open a poll and take the sense of the voters upon the question set forth in the order. The referendum shall be conducted in accordance with §§

24.2-682

and

24.2-684

and the results thereof ascertained and certified in accordance therewith.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-130.3; 1958, cc. 45, 632; 1975, c. 517; 1980, c. 559.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

16 M.J. Schools, § 25.

§ 22.1-106.
Same; levy in accordance with results of referendum.

If a majority of those voting in the referendum vote against a uniform county school levy the governing body may levy such taxes as it deems best, subject to law. But if a majority of those voting vote for a uniform county school levy the governing body of the county thereafter shall, for each succeeding tax year, lay a uniform county school levy and the proceeds thereof shall be expended as provided by law for school purposes including the repayment of district school obligations.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-130.4; 1958, cc. 45, 632; 1980, c. 559.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

16 M.J. Schools, § 25.